en_US.aff
FLAG num
SFX 51 Y 73	
SFX 51 0 ති  .	
SFX 51 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 51 0 නවා  .	
SFX 51 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 51 0 නු  .	
SFX 51 0 න්න  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 51 0 පන්  .	
SFX 51 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 51 0 මි  .	
SFX 51 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 51 0 මු  .	
SFX 51 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 51 0 යි  .	
SFX 51 0 ව  .	
SFX 51 0 වති  .	
SFX 51 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 51 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 51 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 51 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 51 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 51 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 51 0 වමි  .	
SFX 51 0 වමු  .	
SFX 51 0 වයි  .	
SFX 51 0 වහි  .	
SFX 51 0 වහු  .	
SFX 51 0 වයි  .	
SFX 51 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 51 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 51 0 වු  .	
SFX 51 0 හි  .	
SFX 51 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 51 0 හු  .	
SFX 51 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 51 0 මින්  .	
SFX 51 0 ද  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 51 0 නලද  .	
SFX 51 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 51 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 51 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 51 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 51 ි ූ  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවෙමි  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවෙමු  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවෙහි  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවෙහු  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවේය  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවාය  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවෝය  .	
SFX 51 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 51 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 51 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 51 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 51 0 වේ  .	
SFX 51 ි ිය  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවොත්  .	
SFX 51 ි ුවේ  .	
SFX 51 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 51 0 න  .	
SFX 51 0 නට  .	
SFX 51 0 වා  .	
SFX 51 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 51 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 52 Y 73	
SFX 52 0 ති  .	
SFX 52 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 52 0 නවා  .	
SFX 52 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 52 0 නු  .	
SFX 52 0 න්න  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 52 0 පන්  .	
SFX 52 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 52 0 මි  .	
SFX 52 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 52 0 මු  .	
SFX 52 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 52 0 යි  .	
SFX 52 0 ව  .	
SFX 52 0 වති  .	
SFX 52 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 52 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 52 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 52 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 52 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 52 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 52 0 වමි  .	
SFX 52 0 වමු  .	
SFX 52 0 වයි  .	
SFX 52 0 වහි  .	
SFX 52 0 වහු  .	
SFX 52 0 වයි  .	
SFX 52 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 52 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 52 0 වු  .	
SFX 52 0 හි  .	
SFX 52 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 52 0 හු  .	
SFX 52 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 52 0 මින්  .	
SFX 52 0 ද  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 52 0 නලද  .	
SFX 52 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 52 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 52 ි නලදී  .	
SFX 52 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 52 ි ූ  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවෙමි  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවෙමු  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවෙහි  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවෙහු  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවේය  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවාය  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවෝය  .	
SFX 52 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 52 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 52 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 52 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 52 0 වේ  .	
SFX 52 ි ිය  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවොත්  .	
SFX 52 ි ුවේ  .	
SFX 52 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 52 0 න  .	
SFX 52 0 නට  .	
SFX 52 0 වා  .	
SFX 52 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 52 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 53 Y 73	
SFX 53 0 ති  .	
SFX 53 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 53 0 නවා  .	
SFX 53 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 53 0 නු  .	
SFX 53 0 න්න  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 53 0 පන්  .	
SFX 53 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 53 0 මි  .	
SFX 53 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 53 0 මු  .	
SFX 53 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 53 0 යි  .	
SFX 53 0 ව  .	
SFX 53 0 වති  .	
SFX 53 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 53 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 53 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 53 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 53 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 53 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 53 0 වමි  .	
SFX 53 0 වමු  .	
SFX 53 0 වයි  .	
SFX 53 0 වහි  .	
SFX 53 0 වහු  .	
SFX 53 0 වයි  .	
SFX 53 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 53 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 53 0 වු  .	
SFX 53 0 හි  .	
SFX 53 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 53 0 හු  .	
SFX 53 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 53 0 මින්  .	
SFX 53 0 ද  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 53 0 නලද  .	
SFX 53 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 53 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 53 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 53 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 53 ි ූ  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවෙමි  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවෙමු  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවෙහි  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවෙහු  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවේය  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවාය  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවෝය  .	
SFX 53 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 53 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 53 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 53 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 53 0 වේ  .	
SFX 53 ි ිය  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවොත්  .	
SFX 53 ි ුවේ  .	
SFX 53 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 53 0 න  .	
SFX 53 0 නට  .	
SFX 53 0 වා  .	
SFX 53 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 53 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 54 Y 79	
SFX 54 0 ති  .	
SFX 54 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 54 0 නවා  .	
SFX 54 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 54 0 නු  .	
SFX 54 0 න්න  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 54 0 පන්  .	
SFX 54 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 54 0 මි  .	
SFX 54 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 54 0 මු  .	
SFX 54 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 54 0 යි  .	
SFX 54 0 වති  .	
SFX 54 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 54 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 54 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 54 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 54 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 54 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 54 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 54 0 වමි  .	
SFX 54 0 වමු  .	
SFX 54 0 වයි  .	
SFX 54 0 වහි  .	
SFX 54 0 වහු  .	
SFX 54 0 වු  .	
SFX 54 0 හි  .	
SFX 54 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 54 0 හු  .	
SFX 54 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 54 0 ීවා  .	
SFX 54 0 මින්  .	
SFX 54 0 ා  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 54 0 නලද  .	
SFX 54 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 54 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 54 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 54 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 54 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 54 ි ූ  .	
SFX 54 ි ුනෙමි  .	
SFX 54 ි ුනෙමු  .	
SFX 54 ි ුනෙහි  .	
SFX 54 ි ුනෙහු  .	
SFX 54 ි ුනාය  .	
SFX 54 ි ුනේය  .	
SFX 54 ි ුනෝය  .	
SFX 54 ි ේ  .	
SFX 54 ි ෙමි  .	
SFX 54 ි ෙමු  .	
SFX 54 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 54 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 54 ි ෙයි  .	
SFX 54 ි ෙති  .	
SFX 54 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 54 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 54 0 වේ  .	
SFX 54 ි ී  .	
SFX 54 ි ිය  .	
SFX 54 ි ුවොත්  .	
SFX 54 ි ුවේ  .	
SFX 54 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 54 0 න  .	
SFX 54 0 නට  .	
SFX 54 0 වා  .	
SFX 54 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 54 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 55 Y 77	
SFX 55 0 ති  .	
SFX 55 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 55 0 නවා  .	
SFX 55 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 55 0 නු  .	
SFX 55 0 න්න  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 55 ි ියන්  .	
SFX 55 ි ියල්ලා  .	
SFX 55 0 මි  .	
SFX 55 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 55 0 මු  .	
SFX 55 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 55 0 යි  .	
SFX 55 0 ව  .	
SFX 55 0 වති  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 55 0 වමි  .	
SFX 55 0 වමු  .	
SFX 55 0 වයි  .	
SFX 55 0 වහි  .	
SFX 55 0 වහු  .	
SFX 55 0 වු  .	
SFX 55 0 හි  .	
SFX 55 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 55 0 හු  .	
SFX 55 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 55 0 මින්  .	
SFX 55 ි ිද  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 55 0 නලද  .	
SFX 55 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 55 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 55 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 55 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 55 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනෙමි  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනෙමු  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනෙහි  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනෙහු  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනාය  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනේය  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනෝය  .	
SFX 55 ි ේ  .	
SFX 55 ි ෙමි  .	
SFX 55 ි ෙමු  .	
SFX 55 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 55 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 55 ි ෙයි  .	
SFX 55 ි ෙති  .	
SFX 55 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 55 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 55 0 වේ  .	
SFX 55 ි ිය  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනොත්  .	
SFX 55 ි ුනේ  .	
SFX 55 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 55 0 න  .	
SFX 55 0 නට  .	
SFX 55 0 වා  .	
SFX 55 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 55 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 56 Y 53	
SFX 56 0 ති  .	
SFX 56 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 56 0 නවා  .	
SFX 56 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 56 0 නු  .	
SFX 56 0 න්න  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 56 ි ියන්  .	
SFX 56 ි ියල්ලා  .	
SFX 56 0 මි  .	
SFX 56 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 56 0 මු  .	
SFX 56 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 56 0 යි  .	
SFX 56 0 ව  .	
SFX 56 0 වු  .	
SFX 56 0 හි  .	
SFX 56 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 56 0 හු  .	
SFX 56 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 56 0 මින්  .	
SFX 56 ි ී  .	
SFX 56 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 56 0 නලද  .	
SFX 56 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 56 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 56 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 56 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනෙමි  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනෙමු  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනෙහි  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනෙහු  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනාය  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනේය  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනෝය  .	
SFX 56 ි ේ  .	
SFX 56 ි ෙමි  .	
SFX 56 ි ෙමු  .	
SFX 56 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 56 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 56 ි ෙයි  .	
SFX 56 ි ෙති  .	
SFX 56 ි ිය  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනොත්  .	
SFX 56 ි ුනේ  .	
