en_US.dic
බුදි/51
කුමුදි/51
පිසි/52
කිබිසි/52
පරදි/53
වළකි/53
වළඳි/53
වරදි/53
නවති/54
පවති/54
නසි/54
පරදි/54
වළකි/54
පහදි/54
උපදි/55
වදිි/56
